Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1997
Premium rate filings and standards.

(1) No title insurer may charge any rates regulated by the state after September 13, 1997, except in accordance with the premium rate schedule and manual filed with and approved by the director in accordance with applicable statutes and rules and regulations governing rate filings.

(2) The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, including rules and regulations providing statistical plans, for use by all title insurers and title insurance agents in the recording and reporting of revenue, loss, and expense experience in such form and detail as is necessary to aid him or her in the establishment of rates and fees.

(3) The director may require that the information provided under this section be verified by oath of the title insurer's or title insurance agent's president, vice president, secretary, or actuary, as applicable. The director may further require that the information required under this section be subject to an audit conducted by an independent certified public accountant. The director shall have the authority to establish a minimum threshold level at which an audit would be required.

(4) Information filed with the director relating to the experience of a particular title insurance agent shall be kept confidential unless the director finds it in the public interest to disclose the information required of title insurers or title insurance agents under this section.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 20.